Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 147.012, is amended to read: 147.012 OVERSIGHT OF ALLIED HEALTH PROFESSIONS. The board has responsibility for the oversight of the following allied health professions: physician assistants under chapter 147A, acupuncture practitioners under chapter 147B, respiratory care practitioners under chapter 147C, traditional midwives under chapter 147D, registered naturopathic doctors under chapter 147E, genetic counselors under chapter 147F,new text begin anesthesiologist assistants under chapter 147G,new text end and athletic trainers under sections 148.7801 to 148.7815. Sec. 2. new text begin [147G.01] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin For purposes of this chapter, the terms defined in this section have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Anesthesiologist assistant. new text end new text begin "Anesthesiologist assistant" means an individual licensed under this chapter to assist in the practice of medicine only under the supervision of a physician. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Assist. new text end new text begin "Assist" means an anesthesiologist assistant personally performing the duties and responsibilities delegated by the supervising physician. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Board. new text end new text begin "Board" means the Board of Medical Practice or its designee. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Collaborative practice agreement. new text end new text begin "Collaborative practice agreement" means a mutually agreed upon plan for the overall working relationship and collaborative arrangement between an anesthesiologist assistant and one or more physicians that designates the scope of services that an anesthesiologist assistant can provide. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Immediately available. new text end new text begin "Immediately available" means that a supervising physician is in such proximity to an anesthesiologist assistant that the supervising physician is able to reestablish direct contact with the patient to meet the medical needs of the patient and to intervene to address any urgent or emergent clinical problems. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Licensed. new text end new text begin "Licensed" means holding a current license issued by the board. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Physician. new text end new text begin "Physician" means a person currently licensed in good standing as a physician or osteopathic physician under chapter 147. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Provisional license. new text end new text begin "Provisional license" means a license issued by the board under section 147G.03. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Supervising physician. new text end new text begin "Supervising physician" means a physician who delegates, directs, coordinates, consults on, and oversees the performance, practice, and activities of an anesthesiologist assistant through a collaborative practice agreement under subdivision 5, in accordance with the American Society of Anesthesiologists' most recent guidance for best practice of anesthesia in the anesthesia care team model. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [147G.02] LICENSURE. new text end new text begin (a) The board must grant an anesthesiologist assistant license to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) submits an application on the forms approved by the board; new text end new text begin (2) pays the appropriate application fee to the board under section 147G.10; new text end new text begin (3) submits evidence of graduating from an anesthesiologist assistant program accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs or its predecessor or successor organizations; new text end new text begin (4) submits evidence of completing a certification examination administered by the National Commission for Certification of Anesthesiologist Assistants or another national certifying examination required by the board; new text end new text begin (5) certifies that the applicant is mentally and physically able to engage safely in practice as an anesthesiologist assistant; new text end new text begin (6) certifies that the applicant has no current anesthesiologist assistant license in this or another state subject to discipline, revocation, suspension, or probation for cause resulting from practicing as an anesthesiologist assistant; and new text end new text begin (7) submits any other information the board deems necessary to evaluate the applicant's qualifications. new text end new text begin (b) If an applicant is unable to meet the requirement in paragraph (a), clause (6), the board may find after an investigation that sufficient remediation has been made to issue the applicant a license. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [147G.03] PROVISIONAL LICENSURE. new text end new text begin (a) The board must grant a provisional license as an anesthesiologist assistant to an individual who: new text end new text begin (1) meets the requirements in section 147G.02, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (3) and (5) to (7); and new text end new text begin (2) has taken the examination required under section 147G.02, paragraph (a), clause (4), but has not received the results of the examination. new text end new text begin (b) A provisional license expires two years after issuance. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [147G.04] LICENSE RENEWALS. new text end new text begin (a) Except as otherwise stated on a prorated initial license, a license issued under section 147G.02 is valid for a period of one year. new text end new text begin (b) A license issued pursuant to this chapter, other than a provisional license, expires on the last day of the licensee's birth month. new text end new text begin (c) At least 30 days before the license expiration date, the board must send out a renewal notice to the licensee's last known address. The notice must include a renewal application and notice of fees required for renewal. If the licensee does not receive the renewal notice, the licensee is still required to meet the deadline for renewal to qualify for continuous licensure status, except for a person who provides documentation to the board of service in the United States Armed Forces and deployment on active duty. new text end new text begin (d) To renew the license, the licensee must submit the following to the board prior to the current license expiring: new text end new text begin (1) a renewal application form approved by the board; new text end new text begin (2) documentation of completing the continuing education requirements under section 147G.09; and new text end new text begin (3) the renewal fee under section 147G.10. new text end new text begin (e) Before an individual's license expires for noncompliance with paragraph (d), the board must remove the name of the licensee from the list of individuals authorized to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant. The board must place the licensee's name back on the list of individuals authorized to practice if the license is reinstated under section 147G.05. new text end new text begin (f) Notwithstanding section 147G.05, the board must reinstate the license of an otherwise qualified individual within 30 days if the licensee has cured the renewal deadline failure and the license expired solely due to a failure to meet the renewal deadline and not as a result of any unlawful conduct or discipline. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [147G.05] LICENSE REINSTATEMENT. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) and section 147G.04, paragraph (f), an applicant must not apply for license reinstatement until two years after the date of revocation. The board must reinstate the license of an individual whose anesthesiologist assistant license was previously revoked by the board if the applicant: new text end new text begin (1) applies in writing to the board; new text end new text begin (2) meets all initial licensure requirements under section 147G.02, including payment of the initial application fee under section 147G.10, paragraph (a), clause (1); and new text end new text begin (3) demonstrates to the board's satisfaction under paragraph (b) that the individual is completely rehabilitated with respect to the conduct that was the basis for the revocation. new text end new text begin (b) The board must find the following to determine that an applicant is rehabilitated as to the conduct that was the basis for revocation: new text end new text begin (1) the applicant has not engaged in any conduct during the revocation period that would constitute a basis for revocation pursuant to this chapter or rules adopted by the board; new text end new text begin (2) if a criminal conviction was a basis of the revocation, the applicant's sentence has been fully discharged pursuant to statute or any other applicable judicial order from a court of competent jurisdiction; new text end new text begin (3) the applicant has made restitution to any aggrieved person as ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction; and new text end new text begin (4) the applicant demonstrates any other standard of rehabilitation the board determines is appropriate. new text end new text begin (c) If a license revocation is based on a conviction of a felony and that conviction is reversed on appeal, the board must vacate its previous order to revoke the license, and the individual formerly licensed under this chapter may apply for reinstatement as soon as the court vacates the conviction. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [147G.06] UNLICENSED PRACTICE, PROTECTED TITLES, AND RESTRICTIONS ON USE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Protected titles. new text end new text begin No individual may use the titles "Minnesota Licensed Anesthesiologist Assistant," "Licensed Anesthesiologist Assistant," "Anesthesiologist Assistant," or "Certified Anesthesiologist Assistant" in connection with the individual's name or any other words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia indicating or implying that the individual is licensed by the state unless they have been licensed under this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Licensure required. new text end new text begin Except as provided under subdivision 4, it is unlawful for an individual to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant without being licensed under this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Identification. new text end new text begin Anesthesiologist assistants licensed under this chapter must keep the anesthesiologist assistant's license available for inspection at the anesthesiologist assistant's primary place of business. An anesthesiologist assistant must wear a name tag that identifies the individual as an anesthesiologist assistant when engaged in the individual's professional activities. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemptions. new text end new text begin The following individuals are exempt from the licensure requirements under this chapter if the individual does not hold themselves out as an anesthesiologist assistant by or through the title provided in subdivision 1 in association with the provision of services within the scope of this chapter: new text end new text begin (1) an individual regulated under section 214.01, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) an individual listed in section 147.09, clauses (1) to (8) and (10) to (13); new text end new text begin (3) an anesthesiologist assistant student enrolled in an anesthesiologist assistant educational program accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs or its successor agency approved by the board; or new text end new text begin (4) an individual employed by the federal government if the individual is providing anesthesiologist assistant services exclusively under the direction and control of a federal employer. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Sanctions. new text end new text begin An individual who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to disciplinary action and sanctions under the board's authority and injunctive relief under section 214.11. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [147G.07] SCOPE OF PRACTICE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Physician supervision. new text end new text begin (a) An anesthesiologist assistant must only assist in the practice of medicine under the supervision of a physician. new text end new text begin (b) An anesthesiologist assistant must only perform duties and responsibilities delegated to the anesthesiologist assistant by a supervising physician as part of a collaborative practice agreement and in accordance with the American Society of Anesthesiologists' most recent guidance for best practices of anesthesia in the anesthesia care team model. new text end new text begin (c) The supervising physician must be immediately available, as defined in section 147G.01, subdivision 5, to the anesthesiologist assistant during the delivery of medical care. new text end new text begin (d) An anesthesiologist assistant must not delegate a medical care task assigned to the anesthesiologist assistant by the supervising physician to another individual. new text end new text begin (e) An anesthesiologist assistant's practice must not exceed the anesthesiologist assistant's scope of practice or the scope of practice of the supervising physician. new text end new text begin (f) A supervising physician must supervise anesthesiologist assistants in a manner consistent with federal regulations for reimbursement of anesthesia services. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Collaborative practice agreement required. new text end new text begin (a) An anesthesiologist assistant must only practice under a collaborative practice agreement within a hospital or integrated clinical setting where anesthesiologist assistants and physicians work together to provide anesthesia care. new text end new text begin (b) The anesthesiologist assistant and one of the supervising physicians must have experience in providing care to patients with the same or similar medical conditions, including but not limited to experience received while participating in an accredited education and training program. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin General scope. new text end new text begin Subject to any limits specified in the collaborative practice agreement, the scope of practice of an anesthesiologist assistant includes: new text end new text begin (1) services within the education, training, and experience of the anesthesiologist assistant, as determined by the board; new text end new text begin (2) patient services customary to the practice of an anesthesiologist assistant and the collaborative practice agreement; and new text end new text begin (3) other services permitted by law, rule, and the standards of the facilities at which the anesthesiologist assistant practices. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Specific patient services. new text end new text begin Patient services include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) developing and implementing an anesthesia care plan for a patient; new text end new text begin (2) obtaining a comprehensive patient history and performing relevant elements of a physical exam; new text end new text begin (3) performing preoperative and postoperative anesthetic evaluations and maintaining patient progress notes; new text end new text begin (4) ordering and performing preoperative patient consultations; new text end new text begin (5) ordering and administering preoperative medications before the supervising physician cosigns, including but not limited to controlled substances; new text end new text begin (6) changing or discontinuing a medical treatment plan after consulting with the supervising physician; new text end new text begin (7) obtaining informed consent for anesthesia or related procedures; new text end new text begin (8) ordering and administering perioperative continuation of current medications before the supervising physician cosigns; new text end new text begin (9) pretesting and calibrating anesthesia delivery systems and obtaining and interpreting information from the systems and monitors; new text end new text begin (10) implementing medically accepted monitoring techniques; new text end new text begin (11) performing basic and advanced airway interventions, including but not limited to endotracheal intubation and laryngeal mask insertion; new text end new text begin (12) establishing peripheral intravenous lines, including but not limited to subcutaneous lidocaine use; new text end new text begin (13) performing invasive procedures, including but not limited to arterial lines, central lines, and Swan-Ganz catheters; new text end new text begin (14) performing general anesthesia, including but not limited to induction, maintenance, and emergence and procedures associated with general anesthesia, such as gastric intubation; new text end new text begin (15) administering anesthetic drugs, adjuvant drugs, and accessory drugs; new text end new text begin (16) administering vasoactive drugs and starting and titrating vasoactive infusions to treat patient responses to anesthesia; new text end new text begin (17) performing, maintaining, evaluating, and managing epidural, spinal, and regional anesthesia, including but not limited to catheters; new text end new text begin (18) performing monitored anesthesia care; new text end new text begin (19) obtaining venous and arterial blood samples; new text end new text begin (20) administering blood, blood products, and supportive fluids; new text end new text begin (21) performing, ordering, and interpreting appropriate preoperative, point-of-care, intraoperative, and postoperative diagnostic tests or procedures; new text end new text begin (22) obtaining and administering perioperative anesthesia and related pharmaceutical agents, including but not limited to intravenous fluids and blood products; new text end new text begin (23) managing the patient while in the preoperative suite, recovery area, or labor suites; new text end new text begin (24) ordering and administering postoperative sedation, anxiolysis, or analgesia; postoperative respiratory therapy and medicines to treat patient responses to anesthesia; and postoperative oxygen therapy, including but not limited to initial ventilator therapy that may be administered before the supervising physician cosigns; new text end new text begin (25) initiating and managing cardiopulmonary resuscitation in response to a life-threatening situation; new text end new text begin (26) participating in administrative, research, and clinical teaching activities, including but not limited to supervising student anesthesiologist assistants and other students involved in anesthesia education; and new text end new text begin (27) accessing and obtaining prescription drugs for a patient as directed by the supervising physician. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [147G.08] DISCIPLINE; REPORTING. new text end new text begin For purposes of this chapter, anesthesiologist assistants are subject to sections 147.091 to 147.162. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [147G.09] CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS. new text end new text begin Each licensee must obtain the number of continuing education hours per cycle required by the National Commission for Certification of Anesthesiologist Assistants, or the equivalent organization, to maintain certification status. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [147G.10] FEES. new text end new text begin (a) The board may charge the following nonrefundable fees: new text end new text begin (1) anesthesiologist assistant application, $.......; new text end new text begin (2) anesthesiologist assistant annual license renewal, $.......; new text end new text begin (3) duplicate license, $.......; new text end new text begin (4) certification letter, $.......; new text end new text begin (5) education or training program approval, $.......; new text end new text begin (6) report creation and generation, $....... per hour; and new text end new text begin (7) verification, $........ new text end new text begin (b) The board must prorate the application fee in the first year of licensure to account for license renewal during a licensee's birth month and may prorate the application fee in other circumstances as determined by the board. new text end new text begin (c) The revenue generated from the fees must be deposited in an account in the state government special revenue fund. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin [147G.11] ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANT ADVISORY COUNCIL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin The Anesthesiologist Assistant Advisory Council is created and is composed of five individuals appointed by the board. The five individuals must include: new text end new text begin (1) one public member, as defined in section 214.02; new text end new text begin (2) three anesthesiologist assistants who meet the criteria for initial licensure under section 147G.02; and new text end new text begin (3) one licensed physician with experience as a supervising physician. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Organization. new text end new text begin The council shall be organized and administered under section 15.059. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The council must advise the board regarding: new text end new text begin (1) anesthesiologist assistant licensure standards; new text end new text begin (2) enforcement of grounds for discipline; new text end new text begin (3) distribution of information regarding anesthesiologist assistant licensure standards; new text end new text begin (4) recommendations of applicants for licensure or license renewal; new text end new text begin (5) complaints and recommendations to the board regarding disciplinary matters and proceedings concerning applicants and licensees according to sections 214.10; 214.103; and 214.13, subdivisions 6 and 7; and new text end new text begin (6) issues related to anesthesiologist assistant practice and regulation. new text end new text begin (b) The council must perform other duties authorized for the council by chapter 214 and as directed by the board. new text end